Tennessee statutes. Title 33 Mental Health and Substance Abuse and Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities
Part 2

Employees as Guardians and Conservators in State Facilities

33-4-201. Designation of employee as legal guardian or conservator.

The commissioner shall designate an employee of the department whom courts may appoint, regardless of whether the employee resides in the same county as the ward, as legal guardian or conservator for a service recipient in a state facility under title 34, if the court determines that no other person or legally qualified organization will serve for the service recipient and that it is for the best interests of the service recipient that the person be appointed.

Acts 1983, ch. 323, § 4; T.C.A., §§ 33-330, 33-3-901; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 4, §§ 33-4-101 — 33-4-103, 33-4-105, 33-4-107 — 33-4-109, 33-4-111 — 33-4-113 (Acts 1983, ch. 323, § 32; T.C.A., §§ 33-4-106, 33-4-107, 33-7-110; 1996, ch. 795, §§ 1-10. Former § 33-4-104 was merged with § 33-4-103 by Acts 1996, ch. 795, § 3; § 33-4-106, which was transferred to § 33-4-105 in 1996; and § 33-4-110, which was transferred to the second sentence of § 33-4-109 in 1996, is deleted and replaced in the revision of title 33 by Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1, effective March 1, 2001.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Mental Illness, Intellectual Disabilities, and Other Incapacities, § 7.

33-4-202. Qualifications of guardian, conservator or trustee.

An employee appointed under this part as legal guardian, conservator, or trustee for a person shall have sufficient background to understand the person's mental illness, serious emotional disturbance, or developmental disability. Accepting an appointment may not be made a condition of employment unless the duties are a normal part of the employee's duties and there is no conflict of interest. No employee may be appointed as legal guardian, conservator, or trustee of a person who is in the facility in which the employee works.

Acts 1983, ch. 323, § 4; T.C.A., §§ 33-336, 33-3-907; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-4-203. Bond.

If the total value of the assets that are turned over to an employee for a ward does not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) exclusive of the burial fund, the court shall not require a bond.

Acts 1983, ch. 323, § 4; T.C.A., §§ 33-331, 33-3-902; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-4-204. Duration of guardianship or conservatorship.

An employee serving as legal guardian or conservator under this part may serve under these provisions only so long as the employee continues to be an employee of the department and for up to ninety (90) days after the ward leaves the state facility.

Acts 1983, ch. 323, § 4; T.C.A., §§ 33-332, 33-3-903; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-4-205. Funds received by guardian or conservator.

All funds received by a legal guardian or conservator appointed under this part shall be handled as state funds, be accountable as all other state funds, and be audited annually by the state. All earnings on the funds shall inure to the benefit of the ward. The department shall file a copy of the annual audit with the appointing court.

Acts 1983, ch. 323, § 4; T.C.A., §§ 33-333, 33-3-904(a); Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-4-206. Other assets received by guardian or conservator.

All other assets received by a legal guardian or conservator appointed under this part shall be handled as state property, except that the legal guardian or conservator may dispose of the assets in the exercise of the appointment free of laws governing the disposition of state property and shall keep a record of the disposition of all the property and the reason for the disposition.

Acts 1983, ch. 323, § 4; T.C.A., §§ 33-333, 33-3-904(b); Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-4-207. Disposition of assets after termination of guardianship or conservatorship.

Upon termination of the guardianship or conservatorship, all assets remaining in the estate shall be paid to the ward or to the ward's legal representative.

Acts 1983, ch. 323, § 4; T.C.A., §§ 33-333, 33-3-904(c); Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-4-208. Annual report.

An employee serving as legal guardian or conservator shall file the annual report required by title 34 with the appointing court on a form approved by the commissioner.

Acts 1983, ch. 323, § 4; T.C.A., §§ 33-334, 33-3-905; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-4-209. Designation of trustees for patients or residents — Audit.

The commissioner may designate employees of the department to serve as trustees for service recipients if the terms of the trust have been approved in writing by the commissioner and the attorney general and reporter.

All assets, funds, and other property held as a part of the corpus of trust and income from the trust shall be audited annually by the state.

Acts 1983, ch. 323, § 4; T.C.A., §§ 33-335, 33-3-906; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-4-210. Coercion of guardian, conservator or trustee — Penalty.

An employee who attempts to coerce a legal guardian, conservator, or trustee serving under this part to take any particular action as legal guardian, conservator, or trustee shall be dismissed.

Acts 1983, ch. 323, § 4; T.C.A, §§ 33-337; 33-3-908; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.